Washington statutes.
RCW 43.382.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administration" means the developmental disabilities administration of the department of social and health services.

(2) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(3) "Ombuds" means the office of the developmental disabilities ombuds.

[ 2016 c 172 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—2016 c 172: See note following RCW 43.382.005.